Washington statutes.
RCW 7.115.030

Subpoenas—Quashing.

Any person in the state of Washington that receives a subpoena from any court, state or federal, in the United States or any of its territories, may, pursuant to the Washington rules of civil procedure, move to modify or quash the subpoena on the grounds that it is inconsistent with the public policy of Washington under this chapter if:

(1) The information sought concerns the provision, receipt, attempted provision or receipt, assistance in the provision or receipt, or attempted assistance in the provision or receipt of protected health care services that are lawful in the state of Washington; and

(2) Liability in the underlying action is based in whole or in part on a cause of action or criminal liability that is not available under Washington law or the law of another state that is substantially similar to Washington law.

[ 2023 c 193 s 15.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2023 c 193: See note following RCW 7.115.020.